Utah statutes.
17C-3-104.   Existing and historic buildings and uses in an economic
development project area.
If any of the existing buildings or uses in an economic development project
area are included in or eligible for inclusion in the National Register of
Historic Places or the State Register, the agency shall comply with Subsection
9-8-404(1) as though the agency were a state agency.
